Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6016
License, defined.

License shall mean a license to operate a nursing home issued under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act.

Laws 1983, LB 235, § 9;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 123.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.